Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-806
Public agencies; appropriation of funds; supply personnel.

Any public agency entering into an agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act may appropriate funds and may sell, lease, give, or otherwise supply the administrative joint board, joint entity, or other legal or administrative entity created to operate the joint or cooperative undertaking by providing such personnel or services therefor as may be within its legal power to furnish.

Laws 1963, c. 333, § 6, p. 1073;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2206;

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 6.